District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0594.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
12 act may be cited as the "Contracting and Procurement Reform Amendment Act of 2026”.
13 Sec 2. The Procurement Practices Reform Act of 2010, effective April 8, 2011 (D.C. Law
14 18-371; D.C. Official Code § 2-351.01 et seq.) is amended as follows:
15 (a) Section 104 (D.C. Official Code § 2-351.04) is amended as follows:
16 (1) A new paragraph (66A) is added to read as follows:
17 "(66A) "Technical evaluation panel" means a panel composed of program
18 personnel or individuals who possess considerable knowledge of the services requested in the
19 RFQ to assist in reviewing and considering the qualifications of a prospective contractor.".
20 (2) A new paragraph (48A) is added to read as follows:
1

21 "(48A) Procurement procedures manual" means the official guidebook for Office
22 of Contracting and Procurement employees which contains the information and tools necessary
23 for procurement personnel to navigate the District’s procurement process.".
24 (3) A new paragraph (63A) is added to read as follows:
25 "(63A) "Subject matter expert" means an individual from the procuring agency
26 who possesses technical expertise relevant to the solicitation.".
27 (b) Section 202 (D.C. Official Code § 2-352.02) is amended as follows:
28 (1) Subsection (b) is amended by adding paragraphs (4) and (5), to read as
29 follows:
30 “(4)(A) Paragraph (2) of this subsection, and other procedures of this section
31 applicable to proposed contracts in excess of $1 million during a 12-month period, shall apply to
32 a proposed contract modification that increases the dollar value of the underlying contract from
33 an amount less than or equal to $1 million to an amount in excess of $1 million during a 12-
34 month period.
35 “(B) Council approval of a contract described in subparagraph (A) of this
36 paragraph shall not be considered retroactive for the purposes of this act or any other act.
37 "(5) Council approval of a contract that contains one or more option periods each
38 of a duration of 12 months or less shall constitute the Council review and approval required by
39 section 451(b) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87
40 Stat. 803; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.51(b)) of each option period of the contract if the option
41 period is exercised pursuant to the terms of the contract approved by the Council and there has
42 been no material change to the terms of the contract subsequent to the Council’s approval of the
43 contract.".
2

44 (2) A new subsection (i) is added to read as follows:
45 “(i) Review and approval by the Council of an annual program of District of Columbia
46 Supply Schedule contracts under section 412 shall constitute Council review and approval
47 required by section 451 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24,
48 1973 (87 Stat. 803; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.51), of the individual contracts that make up the
49 annual program.”.
50 (c) Section 207 (D.C. Official Code 2-352.07) is amended to read as follows:
51 "Sec. 207. Ombudsman for contracting and procurement.
52 "(a) There is established within the Office of the City Administrator (“OCA”) an Office
53 of the Ombudsman for Contracting and Procurement, which shall be headed by an ombudsman
54 designated by the City Administrator.
55 (b) The ombudsman designated pursuant to this section shall, for all agencies which are
56 subordinate to the Mayor, independent agencies, boards, and commissions, but excluding the
57 Council of the District of Columbia, and the District of Columbia Courts:
58 (1) Serve as a vehicle for both contractors and District agencies to communicate
59 their complaints and concerns regarding contracting, procurement, or specific contracts;
60 (2) Respond to complaints in a timely manner, determine the validity of
61 complaints, and attempt to facilitate informal dispute resolution when appropriate;
62 (3) Generate options for a response by the agency or instrumentality and offer a
63 recommendation from among the options;
64 (4) Except when the parties are involved in legal or administrative proceedings,
65 attempt informally to facilitate a resolution of a dispute between the contracting officer, the
66 prime contractor, and the subcontractor, as appropriate; and
3

67 (5) Identify systemic concerns and recommend to the Mayor and the Council,
68 policy changes and strategies to improve the contracting and procurement process.
69 (c) As of one year of the effective date of this section, all personnel, records, property,
70 and funds related to the Office shall be transferred to OCA. OCA shall have authority over the
71 budget and administration of the Office but shall not interfere in its substantive determinations.".
72 (d) A new section 303 (D.C. Official Code § 2–353.01) is added to read as follows:
73 "Sec. 303. Pay-for-performance.
74 "(a) The Office of Contracting and Procurement shall establish pay-for-performance
75 standards for applicable contracts to ensure that compensation is tied to the delivery of
76 measurable outcomes and benchmarks.
77 "(b) Pay-for-performance provisions shall include:
78 "(1) A requirement that payment from the District be conditioned on the
79 achievement of specific outcomes based on defined performance targets;
80 "(2) Payment schedules that correspond to the achievement of those milestones or
81 deliverables;
82 "(3) The ability for the District to withhold or reduce payments if performance
83 benchmarks are not met, unless excused due to unforeseen and documented circumstances; and
84 "(4) The potential for performance-based incentives or bonuses.
85 "(c) A sole-source or multi-year contract shall include pay-for-performance provisions
86 unless the CPO determines such provisions to be infeasible or inappropriate.
87 "(d) The CPO shall issue guidance identifying other contracts for which pay-for-
88 performance models are appropriate and shall develop model contract terms for use by agencies.
4

89 "(e) Agencies shall consult with OCP in the development of solicitations to determine
90 whether and how pay-for-performance standards should be applied.".
91 (d) Section 401a (D.C. Official Code § 2-354.01a) is amended by adding new subsections
92 (h) and (i) to read as follows:
93 "(h) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prevent the withholding of information or
94 records from the Council, pursuant to section 417a, for the purposes of oversight or
95 investigations.
96 "(i) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a contracting officer or
97 contracting staff from providing information to a client agency on the status of a procurement.".
98 (e) A new section 401b (D.C. Official Code § 2–354.01) is added to read as follows:
99 "Sec. 401b. Technical evaluation panels.
100 "(a) Each technical evaluation panel shall have access to all information provided to
101 OCP, including bid pricing. The procuring agency shall receive the full bid or proposal package
102 and copies of any communication between OCP and the contractor related to the procurement.
103 "(b) OCP shall provide a contract review panel with written justification for any decision
104 to reject the panel’s recommendation. The justification shall be submitted no later than 14 days
105 before the awarding of the contract.
106 "(c) Each contract review panel shall include at least one subject matter expert ("SME")
107 from the procuring agency who possesses technical expertise relevant to the solicitation.
108 "(d) The SME shall participate in the evaluation of bids and proposals, ensuring technical
109 feasibility and adherence to agency goals and requirements.
110 "(e) The SME shall be named by the Director of the procuring agency.".
5

111 (f) Section 412 (D.C. Official Code § 2–354.12) is amended by adding subsections (d),
112 (e), and (f) to read as follows:
113 "(d) Agencies shall be permitted to make direct purchases from the supply schedule
114 without unnecessary delays or additional procurement approvals, subject to thresholds
115 established by OCP."
116 "(e) OCP shall process supply schedule orders no later than 10 business days after receipt
117 from an agency.
118 "(f) OCP shall review and update the District’s supply schedule no less than once every
119 two fiscal years to ensure pricing competitiveness and vendor diversity.”.
120 (g) Section 417 (D.C. Official Code § 2-354.17) is amended by striking the phrase
121 "except as provided by the Freedom of Information Act of 1976, effective March 25, 1977 (D.C.
122 Law 1-96; D.C. Official Code § 2-531 et seq.)" and inserting the phrase "except as provided by
123 section 417a and by the Freedom of Information Act of 1976, effective March 25, 1977 (D.C.
124 Law 1-96; D.C. Official Code § 2-531 et seq.)" in its place.
125 (h) A new section 417a is added to read as follows:
126 "Sec. 417a. Data sharing agreement.
127 "(a) Within 180 days of the effective date of this section, the CPO shall enter into a data
128 sharing agreement ("agreement") with Council to facilitate the transfer of information necessary
129 for Council oversight of procurement practices. The agreement shall include:
130 "(1) A description of information required to be disclosed to Council pursuant to
131 this act and other relevant procurement law that shall be subject to the agreement;
132 "(2) Timelines for the production of such information requested by Council;
133 "(3) Protocol on the transfer, storage, and retention of data;
6

134 "(4) Any restrictions on use or disclosure necessary to maintain confidentiality
135 and the integrity of procurement practices.
136 "(b) Any information not included in the agreement pursuant to subsection (a)(1) that is
137 required by law to be provided to Council, or not otherwise exempt from disclosure, shall be
138 provided upon request without being subject to the agreement.".
139 (i) Section 418(b) (D.C. Official Code § 2-354.18(b)) is amended by striking the phrase
140 "The Inspector General, District of Columbia Auditor, or District" and inserting the phrase" The
141 Inspector General, the District of Columbia Auditor, the Council, or District" in its place.
142 (j) A new section 1104b (D.C. Official Code § 2–361.04) is added to read as follows:
143 "Sec. 1104b. Consolidated procurement portal.
144 "(a) OCP shall develop and maintain a consolidated contracting and procurement portal
145 ("portal") to:
146 "(1) Facilitate communication between OCP and client agencies;
147 "(2) Increase public transparency in the contracting and procurement process; and
148 "(3) Streamline the contracting and procurement process.
149 "(b) The CPO shall issue implementing guidance and develop standard templates for
150 agency submissions and shall coordinate with the Office of the Chief Technology Officer to
151 ensure integration with existing procurement and vendor payment systems.
152 "(c) The portal shall include functionality to establish access licenses for the following
153 entities, with each license having access to all information appropriate to disclose that entity:
154 "(1) Contract officer or staff license;
155 "(2) Client agency staff license;
156 "(3) Oversight license;
7

157 "(4) Bidder license; and
158 "(5) Vendor and contractor license.
159 "(d) Any information that is not required by law to be restricted to one of the entities in
160 subsection (c) shall be made viewable to the public on the portal without requiring registration.
161 "(e) An oversight license shall allow the license-holder read-only access to all
162 information available to a contract officer, subject to section 417a. A unique oversight license
163 shall be provided to:
164 "(1) The Inspector General;
165 "(2) The District of Columbia Auditor; and
166 "(3) Each committee of the Council, subject to 417a.
167 "(f) The portal shall allow for electronic submission of invoices to the District by a
168 contractor.
169 "(1) This subsection shall apply to payments made by, and invoices submitted to,
170 any agency that manages financial transactions through systems maintained by the Chief
171 Financial Officer.
172 "(g) The portal shall include:
173 "(1) A procurement tracking system accessible to all District agencies under the
174 contracting authority of the CPO and the Council committee of jurisdiction to monitor the status
175 of solicitations, contract awards, and procurement activities, including:
176 "(A) The status and a copy of each procurement action and real-time
177 updates including key milestones such as release of solicitation, amendments, evaluation, award
178 determination, and contract execution;
8

179 "(B) Identification of the OCP official or agency representative
180 responsible for each stage of the process;
181 "(C) Estimated timelines for each stage, including expected dates for
182 reviews, approvals, and contract execution, and indication of any timeline delays; and
183 "(D) A communications feature for agencies to submit and track inquiries
184 regarding their procurement requests.
185 "(2) A public transparency portal that shall contain, at a minimum, the following:
186 "(A) Information regarding the statutes and rules that govern procurement
187 for all District agencies, including those exempt from the authority of the CPO.
188 "(B) Links to each District government website containing active
189 solicitations for goods or services in an amount in excess of $100,000, including websites
190 maintained by District agencies exempt from the authority of the CPO.
191 "(C)(i) Each website linked to by the webpage provided for in
192 subparagraph (B) of this paragraph shall:
193 "(ii) Provide clear instructions on how to respond electronically to
194 each solicitation;
195 "(iii) Include information in the solicitation regarding the
196 prohibited recipients or, if the value of the contract is estimated, the likely prohibited recipients,
197 as that term is defined in Section 101(45D) of the Board of Ethics and Government
198 Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Amendment Act of 2011,
199 effective April 27, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-124; D.C. Official Code § 1-1161.01(45D)), for the
200 contract based on its estimated value and any other relevant provisions of Chapter 11A of Title 1.
9

201 "(D) A database containing information regarding each contract executed
202 by the District for an amount equal to or greater than $100,000, including each such contract
203 made by a District agency exempt from the authority of the CPO pursuant to section 105. For
204 each contract contained in the database, the database shall include a unique identifier and, at a
205 minimum, the following:
206 "(i) A copy of the executed contract;
207 "(ii) All determinations and findings related to the contract;
208 "(iii) All contract modifications, change orders, or amendments
209 associated with the contract;
210 "(iv) All solicitation documents for the contract, including all
211 requests for proposals and invitations for bids;
212 "(v) The contract summary documents for the contract that are
213 submitted to the Council for its review; and
214 "(vi) Any amendments to such documents; and
215 "(vii) A notation identifying:
216 "(I) Whether the vendor is a covered contractor, as that
217 term is defined in Section 101 of the Board of Ethics and Government Accountability
218 Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Amendment Act of 2011, effective April 27,
219 2012 (D.C. Law 19-124; D.C. Official Code § 1-1161.01; and
220 "(II) To which prohibited recipients, as that term is defined
221 in Section 101(45D) of the Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and
222 Comprehensive Ethics Reform Amendment Act of 2011, effective April 27, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-
223 124; D.C. Official Code § 1-1161.01(45D)), the vendor is prohibited from making campaign
10

224 contributions and during what prohibited period, as that term is defined in Section 101(45C) of
225 the Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics
226 Reform Amendment Act of 2011, effective April 27, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-124; D.C. Official
227 Code § 1-1161.01(45C)).
228 "(E) Placeholders identifying any portions of the items set forth in
229 subparagraph (D) of this subsection withheld as confidential by the CPO pursuant to section
230 417”.
231 "(F) A list of each contract executed by the District for an amount less
232 than $100,000, which shall include, for each contract, the vendor name, a description of the
233 goods or services purchased, and the dollar amount of the contract; and
234 "(G) Payments made by the District of Columbia government to
235 contractors, searchable by purchase order number, invoice number, check number, voucher
236 number, or any combination of the aforementioned necessary to identify a particular payment.
237 "(3) Agencies not subject to the authority of the CPO shall transmit the
238 information required by this section to the CPO for posting on their websites.”.
239 (k) A new section 1104c (D.C. Official Code § 2–361.04) is added to read as follows:
240 "Sec. 1104c. Forecasting module.
241 "(a) OCP shall develop and maintain a forecasting module that provides a schedule of
242 anticipated solicitations and contract renewals, including:
243 "(1) A description of the anticipated procurement;
244 "(2) The estimated value of the procurement;
245 "(3) The anticipated solicitation release date and contract award date;
246 "(4) The name of the client agency and point of contact;
11

247 "(5) Subcontracting and CBE requirements; and,
248 "(6) Whether the procurement is for a new contract or an existing contract.
249 "(b) District agencies shall be required to submit forecasting data to OCP on a quarterly
250 basis and shall designate a forecasting coordinator to ensure timely and accurate submissions.
251 "(c) The forecasting module shall be made publicly available online and updated
252 quarterly.
253 "(d) No later than 120 business days after the effective date of this section, OCP shall
254 make available on their website an updated procurement procedures manual.”.
255 (l) A new section 1104d (D.C. Official Code § 2–361.04) is added to read as follows:
256 "Sec. 1104d. Clarity and comparability in solicitations.
257 "(a) The CPO shall develop templates and guidance establishing a standardized
258 solicitation structure for clarity and comparability.
259 "(b) Each solicitation shall:
260 "(1) State in plain language:
261 "(A) The solicitation purpose and objectives;
262 "(B) All deliverables, evaluation factors, and performance measures for
263 the solicitation;
264 "(2) Provide a template or standardized format for key sections to enable
265 comparison between submissions;
266 "(3) Avoid open-ended or duplicative questions that hinder side-by-side
267 comparison; and
268 "(4) Include a clear rubric for scoring each criterion.".
269 Sec. 3. Conforming amendments.
12

270 (m) Subtitle N of Title I of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Act of 2014, effective
271 February 26, 2015 (D.C. Law 20-155; D.C. Official Code § 2-211.01 et seq.) is repealed.
272 (n) The Procurement Practices Reform Act of 2010, effective April 8, 2011 (D.C. Law
273 18-371; D.C. Official Code § 2-351.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
274 (1) Section 1104 (D.C. Official Code § 2-361.04) is repealed.
275 (2) Section 1104a (D.C. Official Code § 2-351.04a) is repealed.
276 (o) Section 208(a)(3)(E) of the District of Columbia Procurement Practices Act of 1985,
277 effective February 21, 1986, (D.C. Law 6-85; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.115a(a)(3)(E)) is
278 amended by striking the phrase "in accordance with section 205" and inserting the phrase " in
279 accordance with the Procurement Practices Reform Act of 2010, effective April 8, 2011 (D.C.
280 Law 18-371; D.C. Official Code § 2-351.01 et seq.) in its place.
281 Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
282 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
283 statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
284 October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
285 Sec. 5. Effective date.
286 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
287 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
288 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
289 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
290 Columbia Register.
13